Utah statutes.
16-16-1008.   Liability for improper distributions -- Limitation of action.
(1)  A director who consents to a distribution that violates Section
16-16-1007 is personally liable to the limited cooperative association for the
amount of the distribution which exceeds the amount that could have been
distributed without the violation if it is established that in consenting to
the distribution the director failed to comply with Section 16-16-818 or
16-16-819.
(2)  A member or transferee of financial rights which received a distribution
knowing that the distribution was made in violation of Section 16-16-1007 is
personally liable to the limited cooperative association to the extent the
distribution exceeded the amount that could have been properly paid.
(3)  A director against whom an action is commenced under Subsection (1) may:
(a)  implead in the action any other director who is liable under Subsection
(1) and compel contribution from the person; and
(b)  implead in the action any person that is liable under Subsection (2) and
compel contribution from the person in the amount the person received as
described in Subsection (2).
(4)  An action under this section is barred if it is commenced later than two
years after the distribution.
